North Carolina, session 2025, SB85.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 8 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 11A. Body Piercing Regulated.
"§ 130A-283.10. Body piercing regulated.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Body piercing. – The act of piercing of any part of the body of another person,
other than their ears, for the purpose of allowing the insertion of earrings,
jewelry, or similar objects into the body, through puncturing by use of a needle
or any other method.
(2) Body piercing establishment. – Any location or part of a location where body
piercing is conducted.
(b) Prohibited Practice; Exemption. – No person shall engage in body piercing without
first obtaining a body piercing permit from the Department. Each person who obtains a permit to
practice body piercing under this section shall post the permit in a conspicuous location at the
body piercing establishment. Licensed physicians, as well as physician assistants and nurse
practitioners working under the supervision of a licensed physician, who perform body piercing
within the normal course of their professional practice are exempt from the requirements of this
Part.
(c) Permits. – To obtain a body piercing permit, a person shall apply to the Department
on forms prescribed by the Department. Upon receipt of the application, the Department, acting
through the local health department, shall inspect the premises, instruments, utensils, equipment,
and procedures of the applicant to determine whether the applicant meets the requirements for a
body piercing permit established by the Commission pursuant to G.S. 130A-29(c). If the
applicant meets these requirements, the Department shall issue a permit to the applicant. A permit
is valid for one year and shall be renewed annually by applying to the Department on forms
prescribed by the Department for a permit renewal.
(d) Adverse Actions on Permits; Appeals. – The Department may deny an application for
a body piercing permit if an applicant does not meet the requirements established by the
Commission for obtaining a permit. The Department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a
permit if it finds that body piercing is being performed in violation of this Part. In accordance
*S85-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
with G.S. 130A-24(a), Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act,
governs appeals concerning the enforcement of this Part.
(e) Limitation. – Compliance with this Part is not a bar to prosecution for a violation of
G.S. 14-400."
SECTION 2. G.S. 130A-29(c) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(12) Establishing requirements to obtain and renew a body piercing permit under
Part 11A of Article 8 of this Chapter. The rules shall include requirements for
the sanitation of premises, utensils, equipment, and procedures to be used by
a person engaged in body piercings."
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective on the date that rules adopted
pursuant to G.S. 130A-29(c)(12), as enacted by Section 2 of this act, become effective. The
Codifier of Rules shall notify the Revisor of Statutes of the effective date of rules adopted
pursuant to Section 2 of this act. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 85-First Edition